Maryland, session 2025, SB0191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0191*

SENATE BILL 191
3–819.
(b) (1) In making a disposition on a CINA petition under this subtitle, the
court shall:
(iii) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, find that the child is
in need of assistance and:
1. Not change the child’s custody status; or
2. Commit the child on terms the court considers appropriate
to the custody of:
A. A parent;
B. Subject to § 3–819.2 of this subtitle, a relative, or other
individual; or
C. [A] SUBJECT TO § 5–506.1 OF THE FAMILY LAW
ARTICLE, A local department, the Maryland Department of Health, or both, including
designation of the type of facility where the child is to be placed.
Article – Family Law
5–501.
(M) (1) “UNLICENSED SETTING” MEANS A SETTING FOR THE PLACEMENT
OF A CINA THAT IS NOT LICENSED.
(2) “UNLICENSED SETTING” INCLUDES:
(I) A HOTEL OR MOTEL;
(II) A SHELTER DESIGNED TO MEET THE NEEDS OF A CHILD WHO
HAS RUN AWAY OR WHO IS HOMELESS; AND
(III) AN OVERNIGHT STAY IN AN OFFICE OF THE DEPARTMENT.
(3) “UNLICENSED SETTING” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) THE VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT OF A FORMER CINA;
(II) THE PLACEMENT OF A CHILD WITH AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
IN THE PROCESS OF APPLYING TO BE A KINSHIP CAREGIVER OR FOSTER PARENT; OR

SENATE BILL 191 3
(III) THE PLACEMENT OF A CHILD WITH A PARENT, INCLUDING
IN A FAMILY–BASED RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT SETTING.
[(m)] (N) “Voluntary placement agreement” means a binding, written agreement
that:
(1) is voluntarily entered into between a local department and:
(i) the parent or legal guardian of a minor child; or
(ii) a former CINA whose commitment to the local department was
rescinded after the individual reached the age of 18 years but before the individual reached
the age of 20 years and 6 months; and
(2) specifies, at a minimum:
(i) the legal status of the child or former CINA; and
(ii) the rights and obligations of the parent or legal guardian, the
child or former CINA, and the local department while the child or former CINA is in
placement.
5–506.
(b) In addition to other regulations adopted under this title, the Department may
adopt regulations to carry out §§ 5–506.1, 5–507, 5–508, 5–509, and 5–509.1 of this
subtitle, which relate to the licensing of child placement agencies, child care homes, child
care institutions, and residential educational facilities.
5–506.1.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A CHILD FOR WHOM THE JUVENILE
COURT HAS DETERMINED THAT REUNIFICATION IS NOT IN THE CHILD’S BEST
INTERESTS OR FOR WHOM THE JUVENILE COURT HAS NOT YET MADE THE REQUIRED
FINDINGS UNDER § 9–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) A CINA MAY NOT BE PLACED IN AN UNLICENSED SETTING; AND
(2) STATE FUNDS MAY NOT BE USED TO PAY FOR THE PLACEMENT OR
SUPPORT OF A CHILD IN AN UNLICENSED SETTING.
(C) A CINA MAY BE PLACED IN AN UNLICENSED SETTING AND STATE
FUNDS MAY BE USED TO PAY FOR THE PLACEMENT OR SUPPORT OF THE CHILD IF

SENATE BILL 191
THE AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR THE PLACEMENT AND CARE OF THE CHILD
DOCUMENTS AND DEMONSTRATES BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT:
(1) PROACTIVE, THOROUGH, AND TIMELY EFFORTS WERE MADE TO
PROVIDE SERVICES AND SUPPORTS TO THE CHILD AND THE CHILD’S FAMILY TO
SAFELY REUNIFY THE FAMILY AND THOSE EFFORTS WERE UNSUCCESSFUL DUE TO
REASONS WITHIN THE CONTROL OF THE CHILD OR FAMILY;
(2) THE AGENCY EXHAUSTED ALL REASONABLE RESOURCES TO MAKE
PROACTIVE, THOROUGH, AND TIMELY EFFORTS TO LOCATE A KINSHIP CAREGIVER
UNDER § 5–534 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND IDENTIFIED NECESSARY SERVICES AND
SUPPORTS TO PROVIDE A KINSHIP CAREGIVER WITH AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY TO
CARE FOR THE CHILD AND THOSE EFFORTS WERE UNSUCCESSFUL DUE TO REASONS
WITHIN THE CONTROL OF THE CHILD OR KINSHIP CAREGIVER;
(3) THERE IS NO LICENSED FAMILY–BASED CARE AVAILABLE THAT
MEETS THE CHILD’S NEEDS; AND
(4) (I) THE AGENCY HAS EMPLOYED ALL AVAILABLE INCENTIVES
AND DISINCENTIVES TO OBTAIN A LICENSED PLACEMENT THAT IS IN THE LEAST
RESTRICTIVE SETTING AND THAT MOST APPROXIMATES A FAMILY AND MEETS THE
CHILD’S NEEDS; OR
(II) THE UNLICENSED SETTING IS A REASONABLE
ACCOMMODATION UNDER 43 U.S.C. 12132.
(D) A CHILD’S PLACEMENT IN AN UNLICENSED SETTING UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED 10 CALENDAR DAYS UNLESS
AUTHORIZED BY THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.